Hawaii statutes.
§101-5 Fee simple or lesser estate may be
acquired. In the taking of private property for a public use, a fee simple
estate or any lesser estate may be acquired. [L 1896, c 45, §2; RL 1925, §810;
RL 1935, §52; RL 1945, §303; am L 1951, c 12, §1(d); RL 1955, §8-5; HRS §101-5]

Case Notes

Condemning a fee simple estate subject to existing tenancy.
42 H. 415.

Undivided interests in parcels of land owned in fee simple
are fee simple estates and may be taken in eminent domain proceedings. 50 H.
501, 443 P.2d 140.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next